California, session 20252026, SB1268.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) For purposes of this section, “outdoor public recreation spaces” or “spaces” include, but are not limited to, parks, open spaces, trails, beaches, forests, and other natural areas.(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Outdoor public recreation spaces are a public good and provide significant health, educational, economic, and environmental benefits to all Californians.(2) Many communities, particularly disadvantaged and low-income communities and communities of color, face barriers to access accessing outdoor public recreation spaces, including the lack of access to nearby parks, parks; transportation, financial, cultural, and informational barriers, barriers; and safety concerns.(3) All Californians, regardless of their ages or characteristic backgrounds, deserve access to outdoor public recreation spaces with well-maintained public facilities that offer multiple ways to enjoy these spaces.(4) In expanding access to outdoor public recreation spaces, the state must maintain and manage these spaces to ensure that both people and nature thrive long term, to protect these spaces, and to design these spaces to withstand and adapt to climate change.(5) Outdoor public recreation spaces must respect the historical and current connections between the land and all Californians, including California Native American tribes, people of color, people with disabilities, women, and members of the lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning (LGBTQ+) communities. To ensure that these communities feel safe and celebrated in outdoor public recreation spaces, stories must be told that honor all Californians, historical inaccuracies in such storytelling must be corrected, access to outdoor public recreation spaces must expand for the benefit of people who speak different languages, trust must be built between the visitors of these spaces and the residents of communities that surround these spaces, and the emotional and physical safety of all Californians must be prioritized.(6) The characteristic backgrounds of Californians who make up the environmental and outdoor workforce affect where outdoor public recreation spaces are located, who these spaces are designed for, and where funding for these spaces is distributed. An environmental and outdoor workforce that reflects the diversity of the people of California promotes a sense of safety and belonging.(7) As the current federal administration takes actions that endanger conservation goals and undermine the safety and access to outdoor public recreation spaces by, among other things, opening up public lands to sale and oil drilling leases, promoting offshore drilling in the state, conducting immigration enforcement activities at public parks, and differentiating the National Park Service’s entrance fees based on citizenship status, it is necessary for the state to reaffirm its commitment to protect its cultural and natural resources and expand equitable access to outdoor public recreation spaces.(8) The Outdoors for All initiative established pursuant to Section 1031 1005 of the Public Resources Code advances equitable access to nature, conservation, biodiversity protection, and more. This initiative is critical for maintaining progress to meet the state’s goals, including the state’s outdoor equity goals, and the 30x30 goal established by Governor Gavin Newsom’s Executive Order No. N-82-20, known as the 30x30 goal, to conserve at least 30 percent of California’s lands and coastal waters by 2030.SEC. 2.Division 1.7 (commencing with Section 1030) is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:1.7.Outdoors For All Initiative1030.For purposes of this division, the following definitions apply:(a)“30x30 goal” means the goal established by Governor Gavin Newsom’s Executive Order No. N-82-20, known as the 30x30 goal, to conserve at least 30 percent of California’s lands and coastal waters by 2030.(b)“Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.(c)“Barriers” include, but are not limited to, those concerning financial costs, including park entry fees and equipment costs, transportation limitations, the lack of access to information, the lack of parks and open spaces, safety concerns, physical accessibility issues, and discriminatory practices and policies.(d)“Disadvantaged communities” means communities identified as disadvantaged communities pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.(e)“Low-income communities” has the same meaning as defined in Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.(f)“Outdoors for All initiative” or “initiative” means the initiative established pursuant to Section 1031.(g)“Outdoor public recreation spaces” or “spaces” include, but are not limited to, parks, open spaces, trails, beaches, forests, and other natural areas.1031.The Outdoors for All initiative is hereby established, to be administered by the agency, in consultation with the Department of Parks and Recreation and other relevant state entities, to advance all of the following goals:(a)Achieving equitable access to outdoor public recreation spaces for all Californians to enjoy, regardless of their income, race, ethnicity, geography, age, disability, or other characteristic background.(b)Identifying, reducing, and eliminating barriers to access outdoor public recreation spaces and to connect with nature.(c)Providing opportunities, investments, grants, programs, and park expansions in disadvantaged and low-income communities to address historical and ongoing inequities to access outdoor public recreation spaces.(d)Aligning the goals described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, with relevant goals of the state, including the state’s outdoor equity goals and the 30x30 goal, to ensure conservation strategies enhance public access and benefits for disadvantaged and low-income communities.1032.(a)The agency, in consultation with the Department of Parks and Recreation and other relevant state entities, shall implement the initiative to accomplish all of the initiative’s goals described in Section 1031.(b)In complying with subdivision (a), the agency shall consult with diverse stakeholders, including community-based organizations, local governments, and environmental justice advocates, to ensure inclusive decisionmaking and prevent loopholes.(c)In complying with subdivision (a), the agency shall provide mechanisms for public input and transparency, and consider public feedback, in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(d)(1)On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the agency shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature detailing the progress made to achieve the initiative’s goals described in Section 1031.(2)A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. Section 1005 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 1003, to read:1005. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “30x30 goal” means the goal, established by subdivision (b) of Section 71450 and Governor Gavin Newsom’s Executive Order No. N-82-20, to conserve at least 30 percent of California’s lands and coastal waters by 2030.(2) “Agency” means the Natural Resources Agency.(3) “Outdoors for All initiative” or “initiative” means the initiative established pursuant to subdivision (b).(4) “Outdoor public recreation spaces” include, but are not limited to, parks, open spaces, trails, beaches, forests, and other natural areas.(b) The Outdoors for All initiative is hereby established, to be administered by the agency, in consultation with the Department of Parks and Recreation and other relevant state entities, to advance the objectives of this division.(c) As part of the initiative, the agency shall implement all of the following priorities provided in the Outdoors for All Strategy published by the agency on November 15, 2023:(1) Establish outdoor public recreation spaces for people and nature to thrive.(2) Foster belonging.(3) Connect people and the outdoors.(4) Cocreate with communities.(5) Build equitable career pathways and a representative workforce.(6) Align funding from federal, state, regional, and private sources to achieve the initiative’s goals.(d) The agency shall maintain the position of Deputy Secretary for Access within the agency to coordinate the initiative’s implementation.(e) (1) On or before December 31, 2028, and every five years thereafter, the agency shall update the Outdoors for All Strategy to advance the objectives of this division, to align with relevant goals of the state, including the state’s outdoor equity goals and the 30x30 goal, and to ensure conservation strategies enhance public access and benefits for disadvantaged and low-income communities.(2) In implementing paragraph (1), the agency shall consult with diverse stakeholders, including community-based organizations, local governments, and environmental justice advocates, to ensure inclusive decisionmaking and prevent loopholes.(3) The agency shall host at least three public meetings during the update process. These meetings may be in-person, virtual, or hybrid.(4) The agency shall provide at least one 30-day public comment period on the update.(5) The agency shall post the final update on its internet website in a publicly accessible location.(f) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the agency shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature detailing the progress made to achieve the initiative’s goals, including implementing and updating the Outdoors for All Strategy.(2) A report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Lines 2 and 3.___________________